Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,200
Decree of dissolution.

(MBCA 14.33) (a) If after
a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution
described in section 21-2,197 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the
corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the
clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary
of State who shall file it.

(b) After entering the decree
of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding-up and liquidation of the
corporation's business and affairs in accordance with section 21-2,188 and
the notification of claimants in accordance with sections 21-2,189 and 21-2,190.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 200.